Utah statutes.
63K-2-302.   Enforcement of orders and rules.

The governor may apply to any district court for appropriate equitable relief against any person violating or failing to carry out the provisions of this act or any order or rule issued pursuant to this act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

